Maine, session 132, LD1647.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §4613, sub-§2, ¶B, as amended by PL 2023, c. 263, §1, is further
amended by amending subparagraph (7) to read:
(7) An order to pay to the victim of unlawful discrimination, other than
employment discrimination in the case of a respondent who has more than 14
employees or intentional educational discrimination, or, if the commission brings
action on behalf of the victim, an order to pay to the victim, the commission or
both, civil penal damages not in excess of $20,000 in the case of the first order
under this Act against the respondent, not in excess of $50,000 in the case of a 2nd
order against the respondent arising under the same subchapter of this Act and not
in excess of $100,000 in the case of a 3rd or subsequent order against the
respondent arising under the same subchapter of this Act, except that the total
amount of civil penal damages awarded in any action filed under this Act may not
exceed the limits contained in this subparagraph;
Sec. 2. 5 MRSA §4613, sub-§2, ¶B, as amended by PL 2023, c. 263, §1, is further
amended by enacting a new subparagraph (7-A) to read:
(7-A) In cases of intentional educational discrimination, compensatory damages
as provided in this subparagraph.
(a) A complaining party may recover compensatory damages for loss of
education, loss of educational opportunity, past and future pecuniary losses,
emotional pain, suffering, inconvenience, mental anguish, loss of enjoyment
of life and other nonpecuniary losses.
(b) When a discriminatory practice involves the provision of a reasonable
accommodation, damages may not be awarded under this subparagraph when
the educational institution demonstrates good faith efforts, in consultation with
the person with the disability who has informed the educational institution that
accommodation is needed, to identify and make a reasonable accommodation
that would provide that individual with an equally effective opportunity and
would not cause an undue hardship on the operation of the educational
institution.
(c) Compensatory damages awarded under this subparagraph do not include
any other type of relief authorized elsewhere under this subsection.
(d) Nothing in this subparagraph may be construed to limit the scope of or the
relief available under any other state or federal law.
(e) If a complaining party seeks compensatory damages under this
subparagraph, any party may demand a trial by jury.
(f) This subparagraph does not apply to recoveries for a practice that is
unlawful only because of its disparate impact;